Utah statutes.
59-13-202.5.   Refunds of tax due to fire, flood, storm, accident, crime,
discharge in bankruptcy, or mixing of fuels -- Filing claims and affidavits --
Commission approval -- Rulemaking -- Appeals -- Penalties.
(1) (a)  A retailer, wholesaler, or licensed distributor, who without fault,
sustains a loss or destruction of 8,000 or more gallons of motor fuel in a
single incident due to fire, flood, storm, accident, or the commission of a
crime and who has paid or is required to pay the tax on the motor fuel as
provided by this part, is entitled to a refund or credit of the tax subject to
the conditions and limitations provided under this section.
(b)  The claimant shall file a claim for a refund or credit with the
commission within 90 days of the incident.
(c)  Any part of a loss or destruction eligible for indemnification under an
insurance policy for the taxes paid or required on the loss or destruction of
motor fuel is not eligible for a refund or credit under this section.
(d)  Any claimant filing a claim for a refund or credit shall furnish any or
all of the information outlined in this section upon request of the
commission.
(e)  The burden of proof of loss or destruction is on the claimant who shall
provide evidence of loss or destruction to the satisfaction of the commission.
(f) (i)  The claim shall include an affidavit containing the:
(A)  name of claimant;
(B)  claimant's address;
(C)  date, time, and location of the incident;
(D)  cause of the incident;
(E)  name of the investigating agencies at the scene;
(F)  number of gallons actually lost from sale; and
(G)  information on any insurance coverages related to the incident.
(ii)  The claimant shall support the claim by submitting the original invoices
or copy of the original invoices.
(iii)  This original claim and all information contained in it constitutes a
permanent file with the commission in the name of the claimant.
(2) (a)  A retailer, wholesaler, or licensed distributor who has paid the tax
on motor fuel as provided by this part is entitled to a refund for taxes paid
on that portion of an account that:
(i)  relates to 4,500 or more gallons of motor fuel purchased in a single
transaction for which no payment has been received; and
(ii)  has been discharged in a bankruptcy proceeding.
(b)  The claimant shall file a claim for refund with the commission within 90
days from the date of the discharge.
(c)  Any claimant filing a claim for a refund shall furnish any or all of the
information outlined in this section upon request of the commission.
(d)  The burden of proof of discharge is on the claimant who shall provide
evidence of discharge to the satisfaction of the commission.
(e)  The claim shall include an affidavit containing the following:
(i)  the name of the claimant;
(ii)  the claimant's address;
(iii)  the name of the debtor that received a discharge in bankruptcy; and
(iv)  the portion of the account that is subject to an order granting a
discharge.
(f)  The claimant shall support the claim by submitting:
(i)  the original invoices or a copy of the original invoices; and
(ii)  a certified copy of the notice of discharge.
(g)  This original claim and all information contained in it constitutes a
permanent file with the commission in the name of the claimant.
(h)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall promulgate rules for the allocation of the discharge
under this Subsection (2) to maximize the claimant's refund amount.
(3) (a)  Subject to the conditions and limitations of this section, a
retailer, wholesaler, or licensed distributor is entitled to a refund or
credit of motor fuel tax if:
(i)  dyed diesel fuel or special fuel is mixed with motor fuel; and
(ii)  the retailer, wholesaler, or licensed distributor:
(A)  returns the mixed motor fuel to the refinery for re-refining; and
(B)  has paid the tax on the motor fuel as provided by this part.
(b)  The claimant shall file a claim for a refund or credit with the
commission within 90 days of the date the motor fuel was returned to the
refinery for re-refinement.
(c)  Any claimant filing a claim for a refund or credit shall furnish any or
all of the information outlined in this section upon request of the
commission.
(d)  The burden of proof that the motor fuel was returned to the refinery for
re-refinement is on the claimant who shall provide evidence to the
satisfaction of the commission that the motor fuel was returned to the
refinery for re-refinement.
(e) (i)  The claim shall include an affidavit containing the:
(A)  name of claimant;
(B)  claimant's address;
(C)  date, time, and location of the incident;
(D)  nature of the incident; and
(E)  number of gallons actually required to be re-refined.
(ii)  The claimant shall support the claim by submitting written verification
from a refinery that:
(A)  the motor fuel mixed with the dyed diesel fuel or special fuel was
returned to the refinery for re-refinement; and
(B)  motor fuel tax was paid on the returned motor fuel.
(iii)  The claim filed pursuant to Subsection (3)(b) and all information
contained in it constitutes a permanent file with the commission in the name
of the claimant.
(4) (a)  Upon commission approval of the claim for a refund, the commission
shall pay the amount found due to the claimant.
(b)  The total amount of claims for refunds shall be paid from the
Transportation Fund.
(5) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the commission may:
(i)  promulgate rules to enforce this part; and
(ii)  refuse to accept unsubstantiated evidence for the claim.
(b)  If the commission is not satisfied with the evidence submitted in
connection with the claim, it may:
(i)  reject the claim; or
(ii)  require additional evidence.
(6)  Any person aggrieved by the decision of the commission with respect to a
refund or credit may file a request for agency action, requesting a hearing
before the commission.
(7) (a)  Any person who makes any false claim, report, or statement, either as
claimant, agent, or creditor, with intent to defraud or secure a refund or
credit to which the claimant is not entitled, is subject to the criminal
penalties provided under Section 59-1-401, and the commission shall initiate
the filing of a complaint for alleged violations of this part.
(b)  In addition to the penalties under Subsection (7)(a), the person may not
receive any refund or credit as a claimant or as a creditor of a claimant for
refund or credit for a period of five years.
(8)  Any refund or credit made under this section does not affect any
deduction allowed under Section 59-13-207.
